Illinois, session 104th, HB4545.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Governmental Account Audit Act is amended 5by changing Sections 1, 3, and 6 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 310/1)  (from Ch. 85, par. 701)7    Sec. 1. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 8context otherwise indicates:9    "Governmental unit" or "unit" includes all municipal 10corporations in and political subdivisions of this State that 11appropriate more than $5,000 for a fiscal year, with the 12amount to increase or decrease by the amount of the Consumer 13Price Index (CPI) as reported on January 1 of each year, except 14the following:15        (1) School districts.16        (2) Cities, villages, and incorporated towns subject 17    to the Municipal Auditing Law, as contained in the 18    Illinois Municipal Code, and cities that file a report 19    with the Comptroller under Section 3.1-35-115 of the 20    Illinois Municipal Code.21        (3) Counties with a population of 1,000,000 or more.22        (4) Counties subject to the County Auditing Law.23        (5) Any other municipal corporations in or political   HB4545- 2 -LRB104 17934 TRT 31371 b1    subdivisions of this State, the accounts of which are 2    required by law to be audited by or under the direction of 3    the Auditor General.4        (6) (Blank).5        (7) A drainage district, established under the 6    Illinois Drainage Code (70 ILCS 605), that did not receive 7    or expend any moneys during the immediately preceding 8    fiscal year or obtains approval for assessments and 9    expenditures through the circuit court.10        (8) Public housing authorities that submit financial 11    reports to the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban 12    Development.13    "Governing body" means the board or other body or officers 14having authority to levy taxes, make appropriations, authorize 15the expenditure of public funds or approve claims for any 16governmental unit.17    "Comptroller" means the Comptroller of the State of 18Illinois.19    "Consumer Price Index" means the Consumer Price Index for 20All Urban Consumers for all items published by the United 21States Department of Labor.22    "Audit report" means the written report of the auditor and 23all appended statements and schedules relating to that report, 24presenting or recording the findings of an examination or 25audit of the financial transactions, affairs, or conditions of 26a governmental unit.  HB4545- 3 -LRB104 17934 TRT 31371 b1    "Auditor" means a licensed certified public accountant, as 2that term is defined in Section 0.03 of the Illinois Public 3Accounting Act, or the substantial equivalent of a licensed 4CPA, as provided under Section 5.2 of the Illinois Public 5Accounting Act, who performs an audit of governmental unit 6financial statements and records and expresses an assurance or 7disclaims an opinion on the audited financial statements. 8    "Report" includes both audit reports and reports filed 9instead of an audit report by a governmental unit receiving 10revenue of less than $1,500,000 $850,000 during any fiscal 11year to which the reports relate.12    "Generally accepted accounting principles" means 13accounting principles generally accepted in the United States. 14    "Generally accepted auditing standards" means auditing 15standards generally accepted in the United States. 16(Source: P.A. 100-837, eff. 8-13-18; 101-419, eff. 1-1-20.) 17    (50 ILCS 310/3)  (from Ch. 85, par. 703)18    Sec. 3. Beginning in fiscal year 2027, any Any 19governmental unit receiving revenue of less than $1,500,000 in 20the immediately preceding $850,000 for any fiscal year shall, 21in lieu of complying with the requirements of Section 2 for 22audits and audit reports, beginning with fiscal year 2016, 23either: (i) cause an audit of the accounts of the unit to be 24made once every 4 years and file with the Comptroller an annual 25financial report containing information required by the   HB4545- 4 -LRB104 17934 TRT 31371 b1Comptroller, or (ii) file with the Comptroller an annual 2financial report containing information required by the 3Comptroller, a copy of which has been provided to each member 4of that governmental unit's board of elected officials, 5presented either in person or by a live phone or web connection 6during a public meeting, and approved by a 3/5 majority vote. 7In addition, a governmental unit receiving revenue of less 8than $1,500,000 $850,000 may file with the Comptroller any 9audit reports which may have been prepared under any other 10law. Beginning in fiscal year 2027, any Any governmental unit 11receiving revenue of $1,500,000 $850,000 or more in the 12immediately preceding for any fiscal year shall, in addition 13to complying with the requirements of Section 2 for audits and 14audit reports, file with the Comptroller the financial report 15required by this Section. Such financial reports shall be on 16forms so designed by the Comptroller as not to require 17professional accounting services for its preparation. All 18reports to be filed with the Comptroller under this Section 19must be submitted electronically and the Comptroller must post 20the reports on the Internet no later than 45 days after they 21are received. If the governmental unit provides the 22Comptroller's Office with sufficient evidence that the report 23cannot be filed electronically, the Comptroller may waive this 24requirement. The Comptroller must also post a list of 25governmental units that are not in compliance with the 26reporting requirements set forth in this Section.   HB4545- 5 -LRB104 17934 TRT 31371 b1    Any financial report under this Section shall include the 2name of the purchasing agent who oversees all competitively 3bid contracts. If there is no purchasing agent, the name of the 4person responsible for oversight of all competitively bid 5contracts shall be listed. 6(Source: P.A. 97-890, eff. 8-2-12; 97-1142, eff. 12-28-12; 798-1019, eff. 7-1-15.) 8    (50 ILCS 310/6)  (from Ch. 85, par. 706)9    Sec. 6. When the audit is completed the auditor making 10such audit shall make and sign at least 3 copies of the report 11of the audit and immediately file them with the governmental 12unit audited. Beginning in fiscal year 2027, governmental 13Governmental units receiving revenue of $1,500,000 $850,000 or 14more in the immediately preceding for any fiscal year shall 15immediately make one copy of the audit report and one copy of 16the financial report required by Section 3 of this Act a part 17of its public record. Governmental units receiving revenue of 18less than $1,500,000 $850,000 shall immediately make one copy 19of the audit report, or one copy of the report authorized by 20Section 3 of this Act to be filed instead of the audit report, 21a part of its public record. These copies shall be open to 22public inspection. In addition, the governmental unit shall 23file one copy of the report with the Comptroller and with the 24county clerk of the county in which the principal office of the 25governmental unit is located. A governmental unit may, in   HB4545- 6 -LRB104 17934 TRT 31371 b1filing its audit report with the Comptroller, transmit with 2such report any comment or explanation that it wishes to make 3concerning the report.4(Source: P.A. 101-419, eff. 1-1-20.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.